Utah statutes.
62A-15-203.   Teen substance abuse schools -- Establishment.

The division or a local substance abuse authority, in cooperation with the Board of Juvenile Court Judges, may establish teen substance abuse schools in the districts of the juvenile court.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 8, 2002 Special Session 5

